Utah statutes.
41-1a-202.   Definitions -- Vehicles exempt from registration -- Registration of vehicles after establishing residency.

(1)  In this section:

(a)  "Domicile" means the place:

(i)  where an individual has a fixed permanent home and principal establishment;

(ii)  to which the individual if absent, intends to return; and

(iii)  in which the individual and his family voluntarily reside, not for a special or temporary purpose, but with the intention of making a permanent home.

(b) (i)  "Resident" means any of the following:

(A)  an individual who:

(I)  has established a domicile in this state;

(II)  regardless of domicile, remains in this state for an aggregate period of six months or more during any calendar year;

(III)  engages in a trade, profession, or occupation in this state or who accepts employment in other than seasonal work in this state and who does not commute into the state;

(IV)  declares himself to be a resident of this state for the purpose of obtaining a driver license or motor vehicle registration; or

(V)  declares himself a resident of Utah to obtain privileges not ordinarily extended to nonresidents, including going to school, or placing children in school without paying nonresident tuition or fees; or

(B)  any individual, partnership, limited liability company, firm, corporation, association, or other entity that:

(I)  maintains a main office, branch office, or warehouse facility in this state and that bases and operates a motor vehicle in this state; or

(II)  operates a motor vehicle in intrastate transportation for other than seasonal work.

(ii)  "Resident" does not include any of the following:

(A)  a member of the military temporarily stationed in Utah;

(B)  an out-of-state student, as classified by the institution of higher education, enrolled with the equivalent of seven or more quarter hours, regardless of whether the student engages in a trade, profession, or occupation in this state or accepts employment in this state; and

(C)  an individual domiciled in another state or a foreign country that:

(I)  is engaged in public, charitable, educational, or religious services for a government agency or an organization that qualifies for tax-exempt status under Internal Revenue Code Section 501(c)(3);

(II)  is not compensated for services rendered other than expense reimbursements; and

(III)  is temporarily in Utah for a period not to exceed 24 months.

(2)  Registration under this chapter is not required for any:

(a)  vehicle registered in another state and owned by a nonresident of the state or operating under a temporary registration permit issued by the division or a dealer authorized by this chapter, driven or moved upon a highway in conformance with the provisions of this chapter relating to manufacturers, transporters, dealers, lien holders, or interstate vehicles;

(b)  vehicle driven or moved upon a highway only for the purpose of crossing the highway from one property to another;

(c)  implement of husbandry, whether of a type otherwise subject to registration or not, that is only incidentally operated or moved upon a highway;

(d)  special mobile equipment;

(e)  vehicle owned or leased by the federal government;

(f)  motor vehicle not designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of passengers for hire or for the transportation of property if the motor vehicle is registered in another state and is owned and operated by a nonresident of this state;

(g)  vehicle or combination of vehicles designed, used, or maintained for the transportation of persons for hire or for the transportation of property if the vehicle or combination of vehicles is registered in another state and is owned and operated by a nonresident of this state and if the vehicle or combination of vehicles has a gross laden weight of 26,000 pounds or less;

(h)  trailer of 750 pounds or less unladen weight and not designed, used, and maintained for hire for the transportation of property or person;

(i)  manufactured home or mobile home;

(j)  off-highway vehicle currently registered under Section 41-22-3 if the off-highway vehicle is:

(i)  being towed;

(ii)  operated on a street or highway designated as open to off-highway vehicle use; or

(iii)  operated in the manner prescribed in Subsections 41-22-10.3(1) through (3);

(k)  off-highway implement of husbandry operated in the manner prescribed in Subsections 41-22-5.5(3) through (5);

(l)  modular and prebuilt homes conforming to the uniform building code and presently regulated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development that are not constructed on a permanent chassis;

(m)  electric assisted bicycle defined under Section 41-6a-102;

(n)  motor assisted scooter defined under Section 41-6a-102; or

(o)  electric personal assistive mobility device defined under Section 41-6a-102.

(3)  Unless otherwise exempted under Subsection (2), registration under this chapter is required for any motor vehicle, combination of vehicles, trailer, semitrailer, or vintage vehicle within 60 days of the owner establishing residency in this state.

(4)  A motor vehicle that is registered under Section 41-3-306 is exempt from the registration requirements of this part for the time period that the registration under Section 41-3-306 is valid.

